Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-2631
Grant; use.

A grant recipient under the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Grant Program may use the grant to provide financial or other support to:

(1) The operation of a licensed child care program;

(2) The operation of a license-exempt provider serving children enrolled in child care subsidy;

(3) The child care workforce;

(4) Parents or guardians with children in child care programs;

(5) A federal Head Start program or Early Head Start program;

(6) Start or expand any existing licensed child care program or license-exempt program serving any child on a child care subsidy;

(7) An entity other than the statewide organization contracted to administer the Child Care Capacity Building and Workforce Program that provides administrative or technical support to a child care program;

(8) Build or remodel an existing building for child care purposes;

(9) Any purpose specified in rules and regulations adopted and promulgated by the department; or

(10) Any combination of such purposes.

Laws 2024, LB164, § 35.